New Jersey, session 221, A1506.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, order, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no State, county, or local government employee, entity, or elected official, and no private or public school shall directly or indirectly require an individual who is 18 years of age or younger to undergo the administration of an influenza vaccine or any other injection, medication, or procedure that is designed to provide immunity from influenza. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.